Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1516
Department; provide support; when; priorities.

The department shall begin providing support pursuant to sections 68-1501 to 68-1519 on July 1, 1982. From July 1, 1982, to July 1, 1986, the department shall provide support on a priority basis to families and disabled persons eligible to receive support pursuant to sections 68-1501 to 68-1519. The department shall give priority to those families providing for a severely or multiple disabled family member and to severely or multiple disabled persons in independent living situations. Priority shall also be given to those families and disabled persons (1) with the greatest need for support to maintain the disabled person in the family home or independent living situation, (2) who have the greatest possibility of maintaining the disabled person in the home or independent living situation on a continual basis, and (3) who demonstrate that support pursuant to sections 68-1501 to 68-1519 will provide the most cost-effective form of care for the disabled person.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 16.